tools/spellcheckers/editdist.default-new.regex
] ?*]*
#context condition and "<CORR>" deletion
.o.
[ [? - "<CORR>"]* ( "<CORR>":0 ) [? - "<CORR>"]* ( "<CORR>":0 ) [? - "<CORR>"]* ]
]
|
#
# typing-related stuff, i.e. not related to phonology-orthography interaction
#
[
#context condition
[[? - "<CORR>"]*]
.o.
# initial letter uppercase
# + special case for initial A/Á confusion
[
[a -> [A "<CORR>"]::6 ,
 Á -> [A "<CORR>"]::9 ,
 á -> [Á "<CORR>"]::6 ,
 A -> [Á "<CORR>"]::9 ,
 b -> [B "<CORR>"]::6 ,
 c -> [C "<CORR>"]::6 ,
 č -> [Č "<CORR>"]::6 ,
 d -> [D "<CORR>"]::6 ,
 đ -> [Đ "<CORR>"]::6 ,
 e -> [E "<CORR>"]::6 ,
 f -> [F "<CORR>"]::6 ,
 g -> [G "<CORR>"]::6 ,
 h -> [H "<CORR>"]::6 ,
 i -> [I "<CORR>"]::6 ,
 j -> [J "<CORR>"]::6 ,
 k -> [K "<CORR>"]::6 ,
 l -> [L "<CORR>"]::6 ,
 m -> [M "<CORR>"]::6 ,
 n -> [N "<CORR>"]::6 ,
 o -> [O "<CORR>"]::6 ,
 p -> [P "<CORR>"]::6 ,
 r -> [R "<CORR>"]::6 ,
 s -> [S "<CORR>"]::6 ,
 t -> [T "<CORR>"]::6 ,
 ŧ -> [Ŧ "<CORR>"]::6 ,
 u -> [U "<CORR>"]::6 ,
 v -> [V "<CORR>"]::6 ,
 z -> [Z "<CORR>"]::6 ,
 š -> [Š "<CORR>"]::6 ,
 ž -> [Ž "<CORR>"]::6 || .#.  _ ]
]
#context condition and "<CORR>" deletion
.o.
[ [? - "<CORR>"]* ( "<CORR>":0 ) [? - "<CORR>"]* ]
]
|
#
# typing-related stuff, i.e. not related to phonology-orthography interaction
#
[
#context condition
[[? - "<CORR>"]*]
.o.
# add final punctuation when missing after abbreviations, e.g. Sd.dieđ → St.dieđ.
# change final suffixes often being confused
[
[ [{eamos}] -> [{mus}   "<CORR>"]::15 ,
[{mus}  ] -> [{eamos} "<CORR>"]::15 ,
# word-final s/š confusion (-as vs -aš adjective/diminutive endings), and
# the o/u and e/i noun-class vowels, all extra-cheap in final position
[{s}]     -> [{š}     "<CORR>"]::5  ,
[{o}]     -> [{u}     "<CORR>"]::5  ,
[{š}]     -> [{s}     "<CORR>"]::5  || _ .#. ]
]
#context condition and "<CORR>" deletion
.o.
[ [? - "<CORR>"]* ( "<CORR>":0 ) [? - "<CORR>"]* ]
]
|
[
#context condition
[[? - "<CORR>"]*]
.o.
# abbreviation period, in its OWN parallel-replace block: an epsilon-LHS
# rule sharing a block with ordinary rules empties the whole block.
[
[ 0 -> ["." "<CORR>"]::35 || _ .#. ]
]
#context condition and "<CORR>" deletion
.o.
[ [? - "<CORR>"]* ( "<CORR>":0 ) [? - "<CORR>"]* ]
]
|
[
#context condition
[[? - "<CORR>"]*]
.o.
# dropped final d: illative singular -ii typed for genitive/accusative
# plural -iid (the reverse direction is left at the generic deletion cost:
# cheapening it promoted spurious -i forms over other corrections)
[
[ 0 -> [d "<CORR>"]::17 || i _ .#. ]
]
#context condition and "<CORR>" deletion
.o.
[ [? - "<CORR>"]* ( "<CORR>":0 ) [? - "<CORR>"]* ]
]
| 
[
#context condition
[[? - "<CORR>"]*]
.o.
# substitution if horizontally adjacent on keyboard
# accented letters excluded
[
a (->) [ [s "<CORR>"]::30 ] ,
b (->) [ [n "<CORR>"]::30 | [v "<CORR>"]::30 ] ,
c (->) [ [v "<CORR>"]::30 | [č "<CORR>"]::30 ] ,
d (->) [ [s "<CORR>"]::30 | [f "<CORR>"]::30 ] ,
e (->) [ [š "<CORR>"]::30 | [r "<CORR>"]::30 ] ,
f (->) [ [d "<CORR>"]::30 | [g "<CORR>"]::30 ] ,
g (->) [ [h "<CORR>"]::30 | [f "<CORR>"]::30 ] ,
h (->) [ [g "<CORR>"]::30 | [j "<CORR>"]::30 ] ,
i (->) [ [u "<CORR>"]::30 | [o "<CORR>"]::30 ],
j (->) [ [k "<CORR>"]::30 | [h "<CORR>"]::30 ] ,
k (->) [ [j "<CORR>"]::30 | [l "<CORR>"]::30 ] ,
l (->) [ [k "<CORR>"]::30 | [ø "<CORR>"]::30 ] ,
m (->) [ [n "<CORR>"]::30 ] ,
n (->) [ [m "<CORR>"]::30 | [b "<CORR>"]::30 ] ,
o (->) [ [i "<CORR>"]::30 | [p "<CORR>"]::30 ] ,
p (->) [ [o "<CORR>"]::30 | [å "<CORR>"]::30 ] ,
r (->) [ [e "<CORR>"]::30 | [t "<CORR>"]::30 ] ,
s (->) [ [a "<CORR>"]::30 | [d "<CORR>"]::30 ] ,
t (->) [ [r "<CORR>"]::30 | [y "<CORR>"]::30 | [ŧ "<CORR>"]::30 ] ,
u (->) [ [i "<CORR>"]::37 | [y "<CORR>"]::30 | [ŧ "<CORR>"]::30 ] ,
v (->) [ [b "<CORR>"]::30 | [c "<CORR>"]::30 ] ,
š (->) [ [e "<CORR>"]::30 | [á "<CORR>"]::30 ] ,
y (->) [ [t "<CORR>"]::30 | [u "<CORR>"]::30 ] ,
z (->) [ [č "<CORR>"]::30 | [ž "<CORR>"]::30 ] ,
ž (->) [ [z "<CORR>"]::30 ] ,
æ (->) [ [ø "<CORR>"]::30 | [đ "<CORR>"]::30 ] ,
å (->) [ [p "<CORR>"]::30 | [ŋ "<CORR>"]::30 ] ,
đ (->) [ [æ "<CORR>"]::30 ] ,
ŋ (->) [ [å "<CORR>"]::30 ] ,
á (->) [ [š "<CORR>"]::30 ]
]
#context condition and "<CORR>" deletion
.o.
[ [? - "<CORR>"]* ( "<CORR>":0 ) [? - "<CORR>"]* ]
]
| 
#in addition to the all above, add, del or subst 1 without considering any context
[
#context condition
[[? - "<CORR>"]*]
.o.
[?* [
     # add
     [0:[á|b|c|č|d|đ|f|g|j|k|m|n|ŋ|p|š|ŧ|u|v|w|x|y|z|ž|æ|ø|å|"-"|":"] 0:"<CORR>"]::31 |
     [0:h 0:"<CORR>"]::26 |
     [0:l 0:"<CORR>"]::26 |
     [0:r 0:"<CORR>"]::26 |
     [0:i 0:"<CORR>"]::19 |
     [0:t 0:"<CORR>"]::25 |
     [0:o 0:"<CORR>"]::25 |
     [0:a 0:"<CORR>"]::34 |
     [0:e 0:"<CORR>"]::34 |
     [0:s 0:"<CORR>"]::32 |
     # subst
     [?:? 0:"<CORR>"]::59 |
     # del
     [[? - i]:0 0:"<CORR>"]::51 |
     # digits are never word-internal in Sámi orthography; a stray digit
     # glued to a word (line-wrap, OCR, fat-finger) should be cheap to drop
     [["0"|"1"|"2"|"3"|"4"|"5"|"6"|"7"|"8"|"9"]:0 0:"<CORR>"]::12 |
     [i:0 0:"<CORR>"]::54 |
     [t:0 0:"<CORR>"]::34 |
     [n:0 0:"<CORR>"]::46 |
     [o:0 0:"<CORR>"]::45 |
     [d:0 0:"<CORR>"]::48 |
     [a:0 0:"<CORR>"]::48
]?* ]
#context condition and "<CORR>" deletion
.o.
[ [? - "<CORR>"]* ( "<CORR>":0 ) [? - "<CORR>"]* ]
]
|
[
#context condition
[[? - "<CORR>"]*]
.o.
# transposition 12 -> 21
[?* [
[a:0 ? 0:a 0:"<CORR>"]::17 |
[á:0 ? 0:á 0:"<CORR>"]::17 |
[b:0 ? 0:b 0:"<CORR>"]::17 |
[c:0 ? 0:c 0:"<CORR>"]::17 |
[č:0 ? 0:č 0:"<CORR>"]::17 |
[d:0 ? 0:d 0:"<CORR>"]::17 |
[đ:0 ? 0:đ 0:"<CORR>"]::17 |
[e:0 ? 0:e 0:"<CORR>"]::17 |
[f:0 ? 0:f 0:"<CORR>"]::17 |
[g:0 ? 0:g 0:"<CORR>"]::17 |
[h:0 ? 0:h 0:"<CORR>"]::17 |
[i:0 ? 0:i 0:"<CORR>"]::17 |
[j:0 ? 0:j 0:"<CORR>"]::17 |
[k:0 ? 0:k 0:"<CORR>"]::17 |
[l:0 ? 0:l 0:"<CORR>"]::17 |
[m:0 ? 0:m 0:"<CORR>"]::17 |
[n:0 ? 0:n 0:"<CORR>"]::17 |
[ŋ:0 ? 0:ŋ 0:"<CORR>"]::17 |
[o:0 ? 0:o 0:"<CORR>"]::17 |
[p:0 ? 0:p 0:"<CORR>"]::17 |
[r:0 ? 0:r 0:"<CORR>"]::17 |
[s:0 ? 0:s 0:"<CORR>"]::17 |
[š:0 ? 0:š 0:"<CORR>"]::17 |
[t:0 ? 0:t 0:"<CORR>"]::17 |
[ŧ:0 ? 0:ŧ 0:"<CORR>"]::17 |
[u:0 ? 0:u 0:"<CORR>"]::17 |
[v:0 ? 0:v 0:"<CORR>"]::17 |
[y:0 ? 0:y 0:"<CORR>"]::17 |
[z:0 ? 0:z 0:"<CORR>"]::17 |
[ž:0 ? 0:ž 0:"<CORR>"]::17 |
[æ:0 ? 0:æ 0:"<CORR>"]::17 |
[ø:0 ? 0:ø 0:"<CORR>"]::17 |
[å:0 ? 0:å 0:"<CORR>"]::17 
]?* ]
#context condition and "<CORR>" deletion
.o.
[ [? - "<CORR>"]* ( "<CORR>":0 ) [? - "<CORR>"]* ]
]
;
